Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1067
Foreign-trained applicants; examination requirements.

(1) Applicants for Nebraska licensure who received their training in foreign countries may not be licensed by waiver of examination except as provided in section 38-129.01. In order to be considered eligible to take the examination, they shall meet the requirements of subdivisions (1) and (2) of section 38-1062 and, in order to establish equivalency with subdivision (5) of section 38-1062, shall present proof satisfactory to the department of one of the following:

(a) Current licensure or equivalent official recognition of the right to practice in a foreign country; or

(b) At least five years of practice within the eight years immediately preceding the application.

(2) In all cases such applicants shall take the examination for licensure in the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 56;

Laws 1987, LB 543, § 10;

Laws 1995, LB 83, § 27;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-395;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 329;

Laws 2017, LB88, § 44.